Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 202 Hospitalization of Mental Patients [Repealed]

202.005.
Construction of terms. [Repealed.]

202.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

202.012.
Hospitalization of alleged mentally ill or retarded. [Repealed.]

202.015.
Voluntary admission to mental hospital — Release —Inquest — Procedure. [Repealed.]

202.020.
Notice of petition, to whom given. [Repealed.]

202.027.
Emergency detention for dangerous mental patients — Discharge after seven days unless order made. [Repealed.]

202.030.
Petition for determination of mental condition. [Repealed.]

202.040.
Contents of petition. [Repealed.]

202.050.
Counsel — Duty of attorney for Commonwealth. [Renumbered.]

202.060.
Warrant for arrest of dangerous patient — Detained in hospital or facility, when. [Repealed.]

202.070.
When inquest to be held. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.080.
Jury trial required; exception. [Repealed.]

202.090.
Evidence; witnesses may be summoned. [Repealed.]

202.100.
Petition for sixty day observation, order — Procedure. [Repealed.]

202.110.
Certificate — Contents — Form. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.115.
Additional evidence on petition for observation. [Repealed.]

202.117.
Admission of mental patient on temporary basis — Release unless properly committed. [Repealed.]

202.120.
Person held for further examination — Thirty-five day observation period — Further observation. [Repealed.]

202.130.
Presence of defendant at hearing. [Repealed.]

202.135.
Involuntary hospitalization — Petition — Notice — Examination — Hearing — Order. [Repealed.]

202.136.
Counsel — Duty of attorney for Commonwealth. [Repealed.]

202.137.
Certificate — Contents — Form. [Repealed.]

202.138.
Certificate of staff physicians as to mental illness accepted as evidence, when. [Repealed.]

202.139.
Qualifications of physicians appointed by court — Fee. [Repealed.]

202.140.
Defendant’s right to jury — Oath — Instructions to jury — Evidence. [Repealed.]

202.145.
Copy of judgment to be filed in office of county clerk — Fee — Effect of failure. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.150.
Court to make necessary orders — Appointment of committee. [Repealed.]

202.160.
Commitment to institution, Veteran’s Administration, or committee. [Repealed.]

202.165.
Commitment to United States Public Health Service, other federal agency. [Repealed.]

202.170.
Designation of hospital districts. [Renumbered.]

202.180.
Notification to institution of order committing. [Repealed.]

202.190.
Conveyance, return of patients — Expense — Payment. [Repealed.]

202.200.
Judge to prepare history of patient’s case. [Repealed.]

202.208.
Hospital attendant to convey patient to hospital — Expenses, how paid. [Repealed.]

202.210.
Papers sent hospital on order of involuntary hospitalization. [Repealed.]

202.215.
Hospital may refuse to receive person, when. [Repealed.]

202.220.
Commonwealth’s or county attorney to furnish information. [Repealed.]

202.230.
Disposition of patient if no vacancy in institution — Occurrence of vacancy. [Repealed.]

202.235.
Transfer of patients between hospitals. [Repealed.]

202.237.
Patient involuntarily hospitalized or sent for observation examined, when. [Repealed.]

202.239.
Periodic examination of involuntary patients. [Repealed.]

202.240.
Mental defective not to be received in mental hospital unless dangerous. [Repealed.]

202.242.
Release of patient on convalescent status — Readmittance — Notice. [Repealed.]

202.245.
Admission on application of health officer — Restraint — Removal. [Repealed.]

202.250.
Hospital may refuse to receive person improperly committed. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.252.
Admission of residents adjudged mentally ill or defective by other states — Certification requesting involuntary hospitalization. [Repealed.]

202.255.
Court may order patient hospitalized by agency of United States when — Effect of order of court of sister state or United States. [Repealed.]

202.260.
Additional guard, expenses — Requisites for allowance. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.262.
Transfer of patient to United States public health service or other agency. [Repealed.]

202.265.
Notice to voluntary patients of rights — Re-examination of hospitalization order for voluntary patients. [Repealed.]

202.267.
Patient entitled to humane care. [Repealed.]

202.269.
Mechanical restraints, use — Records. [Repealed.]

202.270.
Disposition of mentally defective. [Repealed.]

202.272.
Rights of patient. [Repealed.]

202.275.
Involuntary patient entitled to habeas corpus. [Repealed.]

202.277.
Patient not released pending involuntary hospitalization proceedings. [Repealed.]

202.279.
Involuntary hospitalization of mentally retarded — Procedure. [Repealed.]

202.280.
Cured person — Discharge. [Repealed.]

202.290.
Inquiry as to restoration — Judgment. [Repealed.]

202.295.
Counsel in restoration proceeding — Fee. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.300.
Restoration or discharge to be noted on record of commitment. [Repealed.]

202.310.
Restoration — Certificate of superintendent. [Repealed.]

202.320.
Procedure for restoration of incompetent person who has not been committed. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.330.
Appeal to circuit court. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.340.
Release upon certificate — Proof of ability to receive patient — Permit required to receive pauper. [Repealed.]

202.350.
Recovery of prisoner — Removal. [Repealed.]

202.360.
County judge may order discharge — Security required. [Repealed.]

202.370.
Temporary removal — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

202.380.
Transfer of prisoners to state hospital. [Repealed.]

202.990.
Penalties. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

202.991.
Penalties. [Repealed.]